Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 6. Revocable Trusts

§ 601.
Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

The capacity of a settlor required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is patterned after Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 11(1) (Tentative Draft No. 1, approved 1996). The revocable trust is used primarily as a will substitute, with its key provision being the determination of the persons to receive the trust property upon the settlor’s death. To solidify the use of the revocable trust as a device for transferring property at death, the settlor usually also executes a pourover will. The use of a pourover will assures that property not transferred to the trust during life will be combined with the property the settlor did manage to convey. Given this primary use of the revocable trust as a device for disposing of property at death, the capacity standard for wills rather than that for lifetime gifts should apply. The application of the capacity standard for wills does not mean that the revocable trust must be executed with the formalities of a will. There are no execution requirements under this Code for a trust not created by will, and a trust not containing real property may be created by an oral statement.
See
Section 407 and Comment.

The Uniform Trust Code does not explicitly spell out the standard of capacity necessary to create other types of trusts, although Section 402 does require that the settlor have capacity. This section includes a capacity standard for creation of a revocable trust because of the uncertainty in the case law and the importance of the issue in modern estate planning. No such uncertainty exists with respect to the capacity standard for other types of trusts. To create a testamentary trust, the settlor must have the capacity to make a will. To create an irrevocable trust, the settlor must have the capacity that would be needed to transfer the property free of trust.
See generally
Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 11 (Tentative Draft No. 1, approved 1996); Restatement (Third) of Property: Wills and Other Donative Transfers § 8.1 (Tentative Draft No. 3, approved 2001).

§ 602.
Revocation or amendment of revocable trust.

Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is irrevocable, the settlor may revoke or amend the trust. This subsection does not apply to a trust created under an instrument executed before the effective date of this title.

If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one settlor:

to the extent the trust consists of community property or property held by tenants by the entirety when added to the trust, the trust may be revoked by either spouse acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses;

to the extent the trust consists of property other than community property or property held by tenants by the entirety when added to the trust, each settlor may revoke or amend the trust with regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that settlor’s contribution; and

upon the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all of the settlors, the trustee shall notify the other settlors of the revocation or amendment.

The settlor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

by substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

if the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:

executing a later will or codicil that expressly refers to and revokes or amends the trust or specifically devises or bequeaths specific property that would otherwise have passed according to the terms of the trust, or

any other method manifesting clear and convincing evidence of the settlor’s intent.

Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee shall deliver the trust property as the settlor directs, but with respect to community property or property held by tenants by the entirety when added to the trust under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the trustee shall deliver one half of the property to each spouse unless the governing instrument specifically states otherwise.

A settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property may be exercised by an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of the trust or the power.

A guardian of the property of the settlor or, if no guardian of the property has been appointed, a guardian of the person of the settlor may exercise a settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property only with the approval of the Probate Division of the Superior Court supervising the guardianship.

A trustee who does not have actual knowledge that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 603.
Settlor’s powers; powers of withdrawal.

While a trust is revocable, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section recognizes that the settlor of a revocable trust is in control of the trust and should have the right to enforce the trust. Pursuant to this section, the duty under Section 813 to inform and report to beneficiaries is owed to the settlor of a revocable trust as long as the settlor has capacity.

If the settlor loses capacity, subsection (a) no longer applies, with the consequence that the rights of the beneficiaries are no longer subject to the settlor’s control. The beneficiaries are then entitled to request information concerning the trust and the trustee must provide the beneficiaries with annual trustee reports and whatever other information may be required under Section 813. However, because this section may be freely overridden in the terms of the trust, a settlor is free to deny the beneficiaries these rights, even to the point of directing the trustee not to inform them of the existence of the trust. Also, should an incapacitated settlor later regain capacity, the beneficiaries’ rights will again be subject to the settlor’s control.

Typically, the settlor of a revocable trust will also be the sole or primary beneficiary of the trust, and the settlor has control over whether to take action against a trustee for breach of trust. Upon the settlor’s incapacity, any right of action the settlor-trustee may have against the trustee for breach of trust occurring while the settlor had capacity will pass to the settlor’s agent or conservator, who would succeed to the settlor’s right to have property restored to the trust. Following the death or incapacity of the settlor, the beneficiaries would have a right to maintain an action against a trustee for breach of trust. However, with respect to actions occurring prior to the settlor’s death or incapacity, an action by the beneficiaries could be barred by the settlor’s consent or by other events such as approval of the action by a successor trustee. For the requirements of a consent, see Section 1009.

Subsection (b) makes clear that a holder of a power of withdrawal has the same powers over the trust as the settlor of a revocable trust. Equal treatment is warranted due to the holder’s equivalent power to control the trust. For the definition of power of withdrawal, see Section 103(11).

§ 604.
Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust; distribution of trust property.

A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that was revocable immediately before the settlor’s death within the earlier of:

three years after the settlor’s death; or

four months after the trustee sent the person a copy of the trust instrument and a notice informing the person of the trust’s existence, of the trustee’s name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable immediately before the settlor’s death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is not subject to liability for doing so unless:

the trustee has actual knowledge of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust; or

a potential contestant has notified the trustee in writing of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust, and a judicial proceeding is commenced within 60 days after the contestant sent the notification.

A beneficiary of a trust that is determined to have been invalid in whole or in part is liable to return any distribution received to the extent that the invalidity applies to the distribution.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section provides finality to the question of when a contest of a revocable trust may be brought. The section is designed to allow an adequate time in which to bring a contest while at the same time permitting the expeditious distribution of the trust property following the settlor’s death.

A trust can be contested on a variety of grounds. For example, the contestant may allege that no trust was created due to lack of intent to create a trust or lack of capacity (
see
Section 402), that undue influence, duress, or fraud was involved in the trust’s creation (

see

Section 406), or that the trust had been revoked or modified (

see

Section 602). A “contest” is an action to invalidate all or part of the terms of the trust or of property transfers to the trustee. An action against a beneficiary or other person for intentional interference with an inheritance or gift, not being a contest, is not subject to this section. For the law on intentional interference, see Restatement (Second) of Torts § 774B (1979). Nor does this section preclude an action to determine the validity of a trust that is brought during the settlor’s lifetime, such as a petition for a declaratory judgment, if such action is authorized by other law.

See

Section 106 (Uniform Trust Code supplemented by common law of trusts and principles of equity).

This section applies only to a revocable trust that becomes irrevocable by reason of the settlor’s death. A trust that became irrevocable by reason of the settlor’s lifetime release of the power to revoke is outside its scope. A revocable trust does not become irrevocable upon a settlor’s loss of capacity. Pursuant to Section 602, the power to revoke may be exercised by the settlor’s agent, conservator, or guardian, or personally by the settlor if the settlor regains capacity.

Subsection (a) specifies a time limit on when a contest can be brought. A contest is barred upon the first to occur of two possible events. The maximum possible time for bringing a contest is three years from the settlor’s death. This should provide potential contestants with ample time in which to determine whether they have an interest that will be affected by the trust, even if formal notice of the trust is lacking. The three-year period is derived from Section 3-108 of the Uniform Probate Code. Three years is the maximum limit under the UPC for contesting a nonprobated will. Enacting jurisdictions prescribing shorter or longer time limits for contest of a nonprobated will should substitute their own time limit. To facilitate this process, the “three-year” period has been placed in brackets.

A trustee who wishes to shorten the contest period may do so by giving notice. Drawing from California Probate Code § 16061.7, subdivision (a)(2) bars a contest by a potential contestant 120 days after the date the trustee sent that person a copy of the trust instrument and informed the person of the trust’s existence, of the trustee’s name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a contest. The reference to “120” days is placed in brackets to suggest to the enacting jurisdiction that it substitute its statutory time period for contesting a will following notice of probate. The 120 day period in subdivision (a)(2) is subordinate to the three-year bar in subdivision (a)(1). A contest is automatically barred three years after the settlor’s death even if notice is sent by the trustee less than 120 days prior to the end of that period.

Because only a small minority of trusts are actually contested, trustees should not be restrained from making distributions because of concern about possible liability should a contest later be filed. Absent a protective statute, a trustee is ordinarily absolutely liable for misdelivery of the trust assets, even if the trustee reasonably believed that the distribution was proper.
See
Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 226 (1959). Subsection (b) addresses liability concerns by allowing the trustee, upon the settlor’s death, to proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property. The trustee may distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust until and unless the trustee receives notice of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust, or until notified by a potential contestant of a possible contest, followed by its filing within 60 days.

Even though a distribution in compliance with subsection (b) discharges the trustee from potential liability, subsection (c) makes the beneficiaries of what later turns out to have been an invalid trust liable to return any distribution received. Issues as to whether the distribution must be returned with interest, or with income earned or profit made are not addressed in this section but are left to the law of restitution.

For purposes of notices under this section, the substitute representation principles of Article 3 are applicable. The notice by the trustee under subdivision (a)(2) or by a potential contestant under subdivision (b)(2) must be given in a manner reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in its receipt.
See
Section 109(a).

This section does not address possible liability for the debts of the deceased settlor or a trustee’s possible liability to creditors for distributing trust assets. For possible liability of the trust, see Section 505(a)(3) and Comment. Whether a trustee can be held personally liable for creditor claims following distribution of trust assets is addressed in Uniform Probate Code § 6-102, which was added to that Code in 1998.